Utah statutes.
63B-17-102.   Bonds to purchase land sale contract -- Maximum amount --
Purchases authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this section may not exceed
$42,500,000.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the
Governor's Office of Economic Development to provide funds to pay all or part
of the cost of purchasing contracts for the sale of land if the purchase
promotes a statewide public purpose such as promoting ease of interstate or
intrastate travel or advancing economic development.
(b)  These costs may include the cost of all related financial analysis and
legal fees.
(3)  The commission, by resolution and in consultation with the Governor's
Office of Economic Development, may decline to issue the bonds authorized by
this section if issuance of the bonds for the purpose authorized in this
section could be construed to violate state law or federal law or regulation.
